Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.735

Access of supporter to personal information.

(1) A supporter is only authorized to assist the adult with a disability in accessing, collecting, or obtaining information that is relevant to a decision authorized under the supported decision-making agreement.

(2) If a supporter assists an adult with a disability in accessing, collecting, or obtaining personal information, including protected health information under the federal health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996, P.L. 104-191, or educational records under the federal family educational rights and privacy act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g, the supporter shall ensure the information is kept privileged and confidential, as applicable, and is not subject to unauthorized access, use, or disclosure.

(3) The existence of a supported decision-making agreement does not preclude an adult with a disability from seeking personal information without the assistance of a supporter.

[ 2020 c 312 s 608.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.